District of Columbia statutes.
48-831.11

Eligibility procedures.

The Department shall:

(1)

Establish simplified procedures for determining eligibility and issuing AccessRx enrollment cards to qualified residents;

(2)

Undertake outreach efforts to build public awareness of AccessRx and maximize enrollment of qualified residents; and

(3)

Adjust the requirements and terms of AccessRx to accommodate any new federally funded prescription drug program.

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 111, 51 DCR 3688